Idaho statutes. Title 5 PROCEEDINGS IN CIVIL ACTIONS IN COURTS OF RECORD
Chapter 9
VARIANCE, MISTAKES, AMENDMENTS

Section.

§ 5-901, 5-902. Material and immaterial variance. [Repealed.]

§ 5-903. Failure of proof. [Repealed.]

§ 5-904. Amendments of course. [Repealed.]

§ 5-905. General power to permit amendments — Relief from defaults — Negligence of attorney

Relief and penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 5-906. Fictitious designation of defendant. [Repealed.]

§ 5-907. Immaterial errors disregarded. [Repealed.]